Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.380

Adverse change in contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of contract—Appeal from—Direct judicial appeal, when.

In the event that an employee, with the exception of a provisional employee as defined in RCW 28A.405.220, receives a notice of probable cause pursuant to RCW 28A.405.300 or 28A.405.210 stating that by reason of a lack of sufficient funds or loss of levy election the employment contract of such employee should not be renewed for the next ensuing school term or that the same should be adversely affected, the employee may appeal any said probable cause determination directly to the superior court of the county in which the school district is located. Such appeal shall be perfected by serving upon the secretary of the school board and filing with the clerk of the superior court a notice of appeal within ten days after receiving the probable cause notice. The notice of appeal shall set forth in a clear and concise manner the action appealed from. The superior court shall determine whether or not there was sufficient cause for the action as specified in the probable cause notice, which cause must be proven by a preponderance of the evidence, and shall base its determination solely upon the cause or causes stated in the notice of the employee. The appeal provided in this section shall be tried as an ordinary civil action: PROVIDED, That the board of directors' determination of priorities for the expenditure of funds shall be subject to superior court review pursuant to the standards set forth in RCW 28A.405.340: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the provisions of RCW 28A.405.350 and 28A.405.360 shall be applicable thereto.

[ 1990 c 33 s 401; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 8; 1973 c 49 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 18. Formerly RCW 28A.58.515.]

NOTES:

Savings—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114: See notes following RCW 28A.400.010.